Vermont, session 2025-2026, S259.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1045 is amended to read:
§ 1045. DRIVER TRAINING COURSE
(a)(1) A driver education and training course, approved by the Agency of
Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall be made available to
students whose parent or guardian is a resident of Vermont and who have
reached their 15th birthday 15 years of age and who are regularly enrolled in a
public or independent high school approved by the State Board.
(2) The driver education and training course made available to students
may be an in-person course or an asynchronous online course.
* * *
VT LEG #385907 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.259
2026 Page 2 of 2
(e) Online driver education and training courses shall meet the content
standards for driver education curricula in the most recent edition of the
Novice Teen Driver Education and Training Administrative Standards.
(f) The Agency of Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall
only approve online driver education and training courses that:
(1) include a means for each student to measure performance outcomes;
(2) use a pool of rotating exam questions;
(3) incorporate accountability features to verify the identity of each
student while the student is engaged in the course of study;
(4) measure the amount of time that each student spends in the course;
(5) provide technical support to customers;
(6) store course content and student data on a secure server with
adequate safeguards in place to protect against data breaches and data loss;
(7) incorporate appropriate measures to prevent unauthorized access to
private information; and
(8) include the ability to update course content uniformly throughout the
State.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385907 v.1